Utah statutes.
53B-1-202.   Disclosure of foreign gifts to higher education institutions.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(c), on or before July 31 of each
year, a higher education institution shall disclose to the board, by filing a
disclosure report described in Subsection (2), a gift received by the higher
education institution of $50,000 or more from a foreign person, considered
alone or in combination with all other gifts from the foreign person, during
the period beginning July 1 and ending on June 30 immediately preceding the
July 31 deadline.
(b)  A higher education institution may rely on the following address of a
foreign person to determine the citizenship or nationality of the foreign
person if the citizenship or nationality is unknown:
(i)  for a foreign person that is an individual, the principal residence; and
(ii)  for a foreign person that is not an individual, the principal place of
business.
(c)  The $50,000 amount described in Subsection (1)(a) is increased to
$250,000 if the gift, considered alone or in combination with all other gifts,
described in Subsection (1)(a) is from a foreign person:
(i)  with a principal residence or principal place of business located in the
United States; and
(ii)  with a permanent resident status:
(A)  under Section 245 of the Immigration and Nationality Act; and
(B)  for 10 years or more.
(2)  A disclosure report regarding all gifts described in Subsection (1) shall
include:
(a)  the amount of each gift described in Subsection (1);
(b)  the date on which each gift described in Subsection (1) was received by
the higher education institution;
(c)  the name of the foreign person making each gift described in Subsection
(1);
(d)  the aggregate amount of all gifts described in Subsection (1) from a
foreign person during the prior fiscal year of the higher education
institution;
(e)  for a conditional gift, a description of the conditions or restrictions
related to the conditional gift;
(f)  for a conditional gift:
(i)  for a foreign person that is an individual, if known, the country of
citizenship or principal residence of the individual; or
(ii)  for a foreign person that is not an individual, if known, the country of
incorporation or place of business of the foreign person; and
(g)  for a conditional gift that is a contract entered into between a higher
education institution and a foreign person:
(i)  the amount;
(ii)  the date;
(iii)  a description of all conditions or restrictions; and
(iv)  the name of the foreign person.
(3)  A disclosure report required by this section is a public record open to
inspection and review during the higher education institution's business
hours.
(4)  At the request of the board, the attorney general may file a civil action
to compel a higher education institution to comply with the requirements of
this section.
(5)  On or before the November interim meeting of each year, the board shall
report to the Education Interim Committee and provide a summary of all gifts
described in Subsection (1) received by higher education institutions during
the prior fiscal year.
(6)  The board shall make rules for the administration of this section in
accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
